Illinois, session 104th, SB1832.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by adding 5Section 18-182 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/18-182 new)7    Sec. 18-182. Abatement; new residential construction 8within redevelopment project areas.9    (a) As used in this Section.10    "Improved parcel of real property" means a parcel where 11redevelopment project costs in a redevelopment project area 12have been used by the municipality for the construction of a 13new single-family residence on a parcel zoned for residential 14use after demolition or removal of a dilapidated structure 15from that parcel.16    "Redevelopment project area" and "redevelopment project 17costs" have the meanings given to those terms under Section 1811-74.4-3 of the Illinois Municipal Code.19    (b) A municipality, upon adoption of an ordinance or 20resolution by majority vote of its corporate authorities, may 21order the county clerk to abate, for 20 years, the portion of 22the taxes levied upon an improved parcel of real property that 23is attributable to the increase in the current equalized   SB1832- 2 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1assessed valuation of the parcel over and above the equalized 2assessed valuation of the parcel immediately before the 3demolition of the dilapidated structure on the parcel. An 4abatement approved under this Section shall be extended to all 5subsequent owners of the improved parcel of real property 6during the abatement period.7    (c) Before final adoption of an abatement ordinance or 8resolution under this Section, the corporate authorities of a 9municipality must notify each affected taxing district of the 10proposed ordinance or resolution. The notice shall be sent by 11mail at least 30 days before the public hearing in which the 12ordinance or resolution may be adopted. 13    Section 10. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 14changing Section 11-74.4-3 as follows: 15    (65 ILCS 5/11-74.4-3)  (from Ch. 24, par. 11-74.4-3)16    Sec. 11-74.4-3. Definitions. The following terms, wherever 17used or referred to in this Division 74.4 shall have the 18following respective meanings, unless in any case a different 19meaning clearly appears from the context.20    (a) For any redevelopment project area that has been 21designated pursuant to this Section by an ordinance adopted 22prior to November 1, 1999 (the effective date of Public Act 2391-478), "blighted area" shall have the meaning set forth in 24this Section prior to that date.  SB1832- 3 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1    On and after November 1, 1999, "blighted area" means any 2improved or vacant area within the boundaries of a 3redevelopment project area located within the territorial 4limits of the municipality where:5        (1) If improved, industrial, commercial, and 6    residential buildings or improvements are detrimental to 7    the public safety, health, or welfare because of a 8    combination of 5 or more of the following factors, each of 9    which is (i) present, with that presence documented, to a 10    meaningful extent so that a municipality may reasonably 11    find that the factor is clearly present within the intent 12    of the Act and (ii) reasonably distributed throughout the 13    improved part of the redevelopment project area:14            (A) Dilapidation. An advanced state of disrepair 15        or neglect of necessary repairs to the primary 16        structural components of buildings or improvements in 17        such a combination that a documented building 18        condition analysis determines that major repair is 19        required or the defects are so serious and so 20        extensive that the buildings must be removed.21            (B) Obsolescence. The condition or process of 22        falling into disuse. Structures have become ill-suited 23        for the original use.24            (C) Deterioration. With respect to buildings, 25        defects including, but not limited to, major defects 26        in the secondary building components such as doors,   SB1832- 4 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1        windows, porches, gutters and downspouts, and fascia. 2        With respect to surface improvements, that the 3        condition of roadways, alleys, curbs, gutters, 4        sidewalks, off-street parking, and surface storage 5        areas evidence deterioration, including, but not 6        limited to, surface cracking, crumbling, potholes, 7        depressions, loose paving material, and weeds 8        protruding through paved surfaces.9            (D) Presence of structures below minimum code 10        standards. All structures that do not meet the 11        standards of zoning, subdivision, building, fire, and 12        other governmental codes applicable to property, but 13        not including housing and property maintenance codes.14            (E) Illegal use of individual structures. The use 15        of structures in violation of applicable federal, 16        State, or local laws, exclusive of those applicable to 17        the presence of structures below minimum code 18        standards.19            (F) Excessive vacancies. The presence of buildings 20        that are unoccupied or under-utilized and that 21        represent an adverse influence on the area because of 22        the frequency, extent, or duration of the vacancies.23            (G) Lack of ventilation, light, or sanitary 24        facilities. The absence of adequate ventilation for 25        light or air circulation in spaces or rooms without 26        windows, or that require the removal of dust, odor,   SB1832- 5 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1        gas, smoke, or other noxious airborne materials. 2        Inadequate natural light and ventilation means the 3        absence of skylights or windows for interior spaces or 4        rooms and improper window sizes and amounts by room 5        area to window area ratios. Inadequate sanitary 6        facilities refers to the absence or inadequacy of 7        garbage storage and enclosure, bathroom facilities, 8        hot water and kitchens, and structural inadequacies 9        preventing ingress and egress to and from all rooms 10        and units within a building.11            (H) Inadequate utilities. Underground and overhead 12        utilities such as storm sewers and storm drainage, 13        sanitary sewers, water lines, and gas, telephone, and 14        electrical services that are shown to be inadequate. 15        Inadequate utilities are those that are: (i) of 16        insufficient capacity to serve the uses in the 17        redevelopment project area, (ii) deteriorated, 18        antiquated, obsolete, or in disrepair, or (iii) 19        lacking within the redevelopment project area.20            (I) Excessive land coverage and overcrowding of 21        structures and community facilities. The 22        over-intensive use of property and the crowding of 23        buildings and accessory facilities onto a site. 24        Examples of problem conditions warranting the 25        designation of an area as one exhibiting excessive 26        land coverage are: (i) the presence of buildings   SB1832- 6 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1        either improperly situated on parcels or located on 2        parcels of inadequate size and shape in relation to 3        present-day standards of development for health and 4        safety and (ii) the presence of multiple buildings on 5        a single parcel. For there to be a finding of excessive 6        land coverage, these parcels must exhibit one or more 7        of the following conditions: insufficient provision 8        for light and air within or around buildings, 9        increased threat of spread of fire due to the close 10        proximity of buildings, lack of adequate or proper 11        access to a public right-of-way, lack of reasonably 12        required off-street parking, or inadequate provision 13        for loading and service.14            (J) Deleterious land use or layout. The existence 15        of incompatible land-use relationships, buildings 16        occupied by inappropriate mixed-uses, or uses 17        considered to be noxious, offensive, or unsuitable for 18        the surrounding area.19            (K) Environmental clean-up. The proposed 20        redevelopment project area has incurred Illinois 21        Environmental Protection Agency or United States 22        Environmental Protection Agency remediation costs for, 23        or a study conducted by an independent consultant 24        recognized as having expertise in environmental 25        remediation has determined a need for, the clean-up of 26        hazardous waste, hazardous substances, or underground   SB1832- 7 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1        storage tanks required by State or federal law, 2        provided that the remediation costs constitute a 3        material impediment to the development or 4        redevelopment of the redevelopment project area.5            (L) Lack of community planning. The proposed 6        redevelopment project area was developed prior to or 7        without the benefit or guidance of a community plan. 8        This means that the development occurred prior to the 9        adoption by the municipality of a comprehensive or 10        other community plan or that the plan was not followed 11        at the time of the area's development. This factor 12        must be documented by evidence of adverse or 13        incompatible land-use relationships, inadequate street 14        layout, improper subdivision, parcels of inadequate 15        shape and size to meet contemporary development 16        standards, or other evidence demonstrating an absence 17        of effective community planning.18            (M) The total equalized assessed value of the 19        proposed redevelopment project area has declined for 3 20        of the last 5 calendar years prior to the year in which 21        the redevelopment project area is designated or is 22        increasing at an annual rate that is less than the 23        balance of the municipality for 3 of the last 5 24        calendar years for which information is available or 25        is increasing at an annual rate that is less than the 26        Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers published   SB1832- 8 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1        by the United States Department of Labor or successor 2        agency for 3 of the last 5 calendar years prior to the 3        year in which the redevelopment project area is 4        designated.5        (2) If vacant, the sound growth of the redevelopment 6    project area is impaired by a combination of 2 or more of 7    the following factors, each of which is (i) present, with 8    that presence documented, to a meaningful extent so that a 9    municipality may reasonably find that the factor is 10    clearly present within the intent of the Act and (ii) 11    reasonably distributed throughout the vacant part of the 12    redevelopment project area to which it pertains:13            (A) Obsolete platting of vacant land that results 14        in parcels of limited or narrow size or configurations 15        of parcels of irregular size or shape that would be 16        difficult to develop on a planned basis and in a manner 17        compatible with contemporary standards and 18        requirements, or platting that failed to create 19        rights-of-ways for streets or alleys or that created 20        inadequate right-of-way widths for streets, alleys, or 21        other public rights-of-way or that omitted easements 22        for public utilities.23            (B) Diversity of ownership of parcels of vacant 24        land sufficient in number to retard or impede the 25        ability to assemble the land for development.26            (C) Tax and special assessment delinquencies exist   SB1832- 9 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1        or the property has been the subject of tax sales under 2        the Property Tax Code within the last 5 years.3            (D) Deterioration of structures or site 4        improvements in neighboring areas adjacent to the 5        vacant land.6            (E) The area has incurred Illinois Environmental 7        Protection Agency or United States Environmental 8        Protection Agency remediation costs for, or a study 9        conducted by an independent consultant recognized as 10        having expertise in environmental remediation has 11        determined a need for, the clean-up of hazardous 12        waste, hazardous substances, or underground storage 13        tanks required by State or federal law, provided that 14        the remediation costs constitute a material impediment 15        to the development or redevelopment of the 16        redevelopment project area.17            (F) The total equalized assessed value of the 18        proposed redevelopment project area has declined for 3 19        of the last 5 calendar years prior to the year in which 20        the redevelopment project area is designated or is 21        increasing at an annual rate that is less than the 22        balance of the municipality for 3 of the last 5 23        calendar years for which information is available or 24        is increasing at an annual rate that is less than the 25        Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers published 26        by the United States Department of Labor or successor   SB1832- 10 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1        agency for 3 of the last 5 calendar years prior to the 2        year in which the redevelopment project area is 3        designated.4        (3) If vacant, the sound growth of the redevelopment 5    project area is impaired by one of the following factors 6    that (i) is present, with that presence documented, to a 7    meaningful extent so that a municipality may reasonably 8    find that the factor is clearly present within the intent 9    of the Act and (ii) is reasonably distributed throughout 10    the vacant part of the redevelopment project area to which 11    it pertains:12            (A) The area consists of one or more unused 13        quarries, mines, or strip mine ponds.14            (B) The area consists of unused rail yards, rail 15        tracks, or railroad rights-of-way.16            (C) The area, prior to its designation, is subject 17        to (i) chronic flooding that adversely impacts on real 18        property in the area as certified by a registered 19        professional engineer or appropriate regulatory agency 20        or (ii) surface water that discharges from all or a 21        part of the area and contributes to flooding within 22        the same watershed, but only if the redevelopment 23        project provides for facilities or improvements to 24        contribute to the alleviation of all or part of the 25        flooding.26            (D) The area consists of an unused or illegal   SB1832- 11 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1        disposal site containing earth, stone, building 2        debris, or similar materials that were removed from 3        construction, demolition, excavation, or dredge sites.4            (E) Prior to November 1, 1999, the area is not less 5        than 50 nor more than 100 acres and 75% of which is 6        vacant (notwithstanding that the area has been used 7        for commercial agricultural purposes within 5 years 8        prior to the designation of the redevelopment project 9        area), and the area meets at least one of the factors 10        itemized in paragraph (1) of this subsection, the area 11        has been designated as a town or village center by 12        ordinance or comprehensive plan adopted prior to 13        January 1, 1982, and the area has not been developed 14        for that designated purpose.15            (F) The area qualified as a blighted improved area 16        immediately prior to becoming vacant, unless there has 17        been substantial private investment in the immediately 18        surrounding area.19    (b) For any redevelopment project area that has been 20designated pursuant to this Section by an ordinance adopted 21prior to November 1, 1999 (the effective date of Public Act 2291-478), "conservation area" shall have the meaning set forth 23in this Section prior to that date.24    On and after November 1, 1999, "conservation area" means 25any improved area within the boundaries of a redevelopment 26project area located within the territorial limits of the   SB1832- 12 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1municipality in which 50% or more of the structures in the area 2have an age of 35 years or more. Such an area is not yet a 3blighted area but because of a combination of 3 or more of the 4following factors is detrimental to the public safety, health, 5morals or welfare and such an area may become a blighted area:6        (1) Dilapidation. An advanced state of disrepair or 7    neglect of necessary repairs to the primary structural 8    components of buildings or improvements in such a 9    combination that a documented building condition analysis 10    determines that major repair is required or the defects 11    are so serious and so extensive that the buildings must be 12    removed.13        (2) Obsolescence. The condition or process of falling 14    into disuse. Structures have become ill-suited for the 15    original use.16        (3) Deterioration. With respect to buildings, defects 17    including, but not limited to, major defects in the 18    secondary building components such as doors, windows, 19    porches, gutters and downspouts, and fascia. With respect 20    to surface improvements, that the condition of roadways, 21    alleys, curbs, gutters, sidewalks, off-street parking, and 22    surface storage areas evidence deterioration, including, 23    but not limited to, surface cracking, crumbling, potholes, 24    depressions, loose paving material, and weeds protruding 25    through paved surfaces.26        (4) Presence of structures below minimum code   SB1832- 13 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1    standards. All structures that do not meet the standards 2    of zoning, subdivision, building, fire, and other 3    governmental codes applicable to property, but not 4    including housing and property maintenance codes.5        (5) Illegal use of individual structures. The use of 6    structures in violation of applicable federal, State, or 7    local laws, exclusive of those applicable to the presence 8    of structures below minimum code standards.9        (6) Excessive vacancies. The presence of buildings 10    that are unoccupied or under-utilized and that represent 11    an adverse influence on the area because of the frequency, 12    extent, or duration of the vacancies.13        (7) Lack of ventilation, light, or sanitary 14    facilities. The absence of adequate ventilation for light 15    or air circulation in spaces or rooms without windows, or 16    that require the removal of dust, odor, gas, smoke, or 17    other noxious airborne materials. Inadequate natural light 18    and ventilation means the absence or inadequacy of 19    skylights or windows for interior spaces or rooms and 20    improper window sizes and amounts by room area to window 21    area ratios. Inadequate sanitary facilities refers to the 22    absence or inadequacy of garbage storage and enclosure, 23    bathroom facilities, hot water and kitchens, and 24    structural inadequacies preventing ingress and egress to 25    and from all rooms and units within a building.26        (8) Inadequate utilities. Underground and overhead   SB1832- 14 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1    utilities such as storm sewers and storm drainage, 2    sanitary sewers, water lines, and gas, telephone, and 3    electrical services that are shown to be inadequate. 4    Inadequate utilities are those that are: (i) of 5    insufficient capacity to serve the uses in the 6    redevelopment project area, (ii) deteriorated, antiquated, 7    obsolete, or in disrepair, or (iii) lacking within the 8    redevelopment project area.9        (9) Excessive land coverage and overcrowding of 10    structures and community facilities. The over-intensive 11    use of property and the crowding of buildings and 12    accessory facilities onto a site. Examples of problem 13    conditions warranting the designation of an area as one 14    exhibiting excessive land coverage are: the presence of 15    buildings either improperly situated on parcels or located 16    on parcels of inadequate size and shape in relation to 17    present-day standards of development for health and safety 18    and the presence of multiple buildings on a single parcel. 19    For there to be a finding of excessive land coverage, 20    these parcels must exhibit one or more of the following 21    conditions: insufficient provision for light and air 22    within or around buildings, increased threat of spread of 23    fire due to the close proximity of buildings, lack of 24    adequate or proper access to a public right-of-way, lack 25    of reasonably required off-street parking, or inadequate 26    provision for loading and service.  SB1832- 15 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1        (10) Deleterious land use or layout. The existence of 2    incompatible land-use relationships, buildings occupied by 3    inappropriate mixed-uses, or uses considered to be 4    noxious, offensive, or unsuitable for the surrounding 5    area.6        (11) Lack of community planning. The proposed 7    redevelopment project area was developed prior to or 8    without the benefit or guidance of a community plan. This 9    means that the development occurred prior to the adoption 10    by the municipality of a comprehensive or other community 11    plan or that the plan was not followed at the time of the 12    area's development. This factor must be documented by 13    evidence of adverse or incompatible land-use 14    relationships, inadequate street layout, improper 15    subdivision, parcels of inadequate shape and size to meet 16    contemporary development standards, or other evidence 17    demonstrating an absence of effective community planning.18        (12) The area has incurred Illinois Environmental 19    Protection Agency or United States Environmental 20    Protection Agency remediation costs for, or a study 21    conducted by an independent consultant recognized as 22    having expertise in environmental remediation has 23    determined a need for, the clean-up of hazardous waste, 24    hazardous substances, or underground storage tanks 25    required by State or federal law, provided that the 26    remediation costs constitute a material impediment to the   SB1832- 16 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1    development or redevelopment of the redevelopment project 2    area.3        (13) The total equalized assessed value of the 4    proposed redevelopment project area has declined for 3 of 5    the last 5 calendar years for which information is 6    available or is increasing at an annual rate that is less 7    than the balance of the municipality for 3 of the last 5 8    calendar years for which information is available or is 9    increasing at an annual rate that is less than the 10    Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers published by 11    the United States Department of Labor or successor agency 12    for 3 of the last 5 calendar years for which information is 13    available.14    (c) "Industrial park" means an area in a blighted or 15conservation area suitable for use by any manufacturing, 16industrial, research or transportation enterprise, of 17facilities to include but not be limited to factories, mills, 18processing plants, assembly plants, packing plants, 19fabricating plants, industrial distribution centers, 20warehouses, repair overhaul or service facilities, freight 21terminals, research facilities, test facilities or railroad 22facilities.23    (d) "Industrial park conservation area" means an area 24within the boundaries of a redevelopment project area located 25within the territorial limits of a municipality that is a 26labor surplus municipality or within 1 1/2 miles of the   SB1832- 17 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1territorial limits of a municipality that is a labor surplus 2municipality if the area is annexed to the municipality; which 3area is zoned as industrial no later than at the time the 4municipality by ordinance designates the redevelopment project 5area, and which area includes both vacant land suitable for 6use as an industrial park and a blighted area or conservation 7area contiguous to such vacant land.8    (e) "Labor surplus municipality" means a municipality in 9which, at any time during the 6 months before the municipality 10by ordinance designates an industrial park conservation area, 11the unemployment rate was over 6% and was also 100% or more of 12the national average unemployment rate for that same time as 13published in the United States Department of Labor Bureau of 14Labor Statistics publication entitled "The Employment 15Situation" or its successor publication. For the purpose of 16this subsection, if unemployment rate statistics for the 17municipality are not available, the unemployment rate in the 18municipality shall be deemed to be the same as the 19unemployment rate in the principal county in which the 20municipality is located.21    (f) "Municipality" shall mean a city, village, 22incorporated town, or a township that is located in the 23unincorporated portion of a county with 3 million or more 24inhabitants, if the county adopted an ordinance that approved 25the township's redevelopment plan.26    (g) "Initial Sales Tax Amounts" means the amount of taxes   SB1832- 18 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1paid under the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, Use Tax Act, 2Service Use Tax Act, the Service Occupation Tax Act, the 3Municipal Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, and the Municipal 4Service Occupation Tax Act by retailers and servicemen on 5transactions at places located in a State Sales Tax Boundary 6during the calendar year 1985.7    (g-1) "Revised Initial Sales Tax Amounts" means the amount 8of taxes paid under the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, Use Tax 9Act, Service Use Tax Act, the Service Occupation Tax Act, the 10Municipal Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, and the Municipal 11Service Occupation Tax Act by retailers and servicemen on 12transactions at places located within the State Sales Tax 13Boundary revised pursuant to Section 11-74.4-8a(9) of this 14Act.15    (h) "Municipal Sales Tax Increment" means an amount equal 16to the increase in the aggregate amount of taxes paid to a 17municipality from the Local Government Tax Fund arising from 18sales by retailers and servicemen within the redevelopment 19project area or State Sales Tax Boundary, as the case may be, 20for as long as the redevelopment project area or State Sales 21Tax Boundary, as the case may be, exist over and above the 22aggregate amount of taxes as certified by the Illinois 23Department of Revenue and paid under the Municipal Retailers' 24Occupation Tax Act and the Municipal Service Occupation Tax 25Act by retailers and servicemen, on transactions at places of 26business located in the redevelopment project area or State   SB1832- 19 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1Sales Tax Boundary, as the case may be, during the base year 2which shall be the calendar year immediately prior to the year 3in which the municipality adopted tax increment allocation 4financing. For purposes of computing the aggregate amount of 5such taxes for base years occurring prior to 1985, the 6Department of Revenue shall determine the Initial Sales Tax 7Amounts for such taxes and deduct therefrom an amount equal to 84% of the aggregate amount of taxes per year for each year the 9base year is prior to 1985, but not to exceed a total deduction 10of 12%. The amount so determined shall be known as the 11"Adjusted Initial Sales Tax Amounts". For purposes of 12determining the Municipal Sales Tax Increment, the Department 13of Revenue shall for each period subtract from the amount paid 14to the municipality from the Local Government Tax Fund arising 15from sales by retailers and servicemen on transactions located 16in the redevelopment project area or the State Sales Tax 17Boundary, as the case may be, the certified Initial Sales Tax 18Amounts, the Adjusted Initial Sales Tax Amounts or the Revised 19Initial Sales Tax Amounts for the Municipal Retailers' 20Occupation Tax Act and the Municipal Service Occupation Tax 21Act. For the State Fiscal Year 1989, this calculation shall be 22made by utilizing the calendar year 1987 to determine the tax 23amounts received. For the State Fiscal Year 1990, this 24calculation shall be made by utilizing the period from January 251, 1988, until September 30, 1988, to determine the tax 26amounts received from retailers and servicemen pursuant to the   SB1832- 20 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1Municipal Retailers' Occupation Tax and the Municipal Service 2Occupation Tax Act, which shall have deducted therefrom 3nine-twelfths of the certified Initial Sales Tax Amounts, the 4Adjusted Initial Sales Tax Amounts or the Revised Initial 5Sales Tax Amounts as appropriate. For the State Fiscal Year 61991, this calculation shall be made by utilizing the period 7from October 1, 1988, to June 30, 1989, to determine the tax 8amounts received from retailers and servicemen pursuant to the 9Municipal Retailers' Occupation Tax and the Municipal Service 10Occupation Tax Act which shall have deducted therefrom 11nine-twelfths of the certified Initial Sales Tax Amounts, 12Adjusted Initial Sales Tax Amounts or the Revised Initial 13Sales Tax Amounts as appropriate. For every State Fiscal Year 14thereafter, the applicable period shall be the 12 months 15beginning July 1 and ending June 30 to determine the tax 16amounts received which shall have deducted therefrom the 17certified Initial Sales Tax Amounts, the Adjusted Initial 18Sales Tax Amounts or the Revised Initial Sales Tax Amounts, as 19the case may be.20    (i) "Net State Sales Tax Increment" means the sum of the 21following: (a) 80% of the first $100,000 of State Sales Tax 22Increment annually generated within a State Sales Tax 23Boundary; (b) 60% of the amount in excess of $100,000 but not 24exceeding $500,000 of State Sales Tax Increment annually 25generated within a State Sales Tax Boundary; and (c) 40% of all 26amounts in excess of $500,000 of State Sales Tax Increment   SB1832- 21 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1annually generated within a State Sales Tax Boundary. If, 2however, a municipality established a tax increment financing 3district in a county with a population in excess of 3,000,000 4before January 1, 1986, and the municipality entered into a 5contract or issued bonds after January 1, 1986, but before 6December 31, 1986, to finance redevelopment project costs 7within a State Sales Tax Boundary, then the Net State Sales Tax 8Increment means, for the fiscal years beginning July 1, 1990, 9and July 1, 1991, 100% of the State Sales Tax Increment 10annually generated within a State Sales Tax Boundary; and 11notwithstanding any other provision of this Act, for those 12fiscal years the Department of Revenue shall distribute to 13those municipalities 100% of their Net State Sales Tax 14Increment before any distribution to any other municipality 15and regardless of whether or not those other municipalities 16will receive 100% of their Net State Sales Tax Increment. For 17Fiscal Year 1999, and every year thereafter until the year 182007, for any municipality that has not entered into a 19contract or has not issued bonds prior to June 1, 1988 to 20finance redevelopment project costs within a State Sales Tax 21Boundary, the Net State Sales Tax Increment shall be 22calculated as follows: By multiplying the Net State Sales Tax 23Increment by 90% in the State Fiscal Year 1999; 80% in the 24State Fiscal Year 2000; 70% in the State Fiscal Year 2001; 60% 25in the State Fiscal Year 2002; 50% in the State Fiscal Year 262003; 40% in the State Fiscal Year 2004; 30% in the State   SB1832- 22 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1Fiscal Year 2005; 20% in the State Fiscal Year 2006; and 10% in 2the State Fiscal Year 2007. No payment shall be made for State 3Fiscal Year 2008 and thereafter.4    Municipalities that issued bonds in connection with a 5redevelopment project in a redevelopment project area within 6the State Sales Tax Boundary prior to July 29, 1991, or that 7entered into contracts in connection with a redevelopment 8project in a redevelopment project area before June 1, 1988, 9shall continue to receive their proportional share of the 10Illinois Tax Increment Fund distribution until the date on 11which the redevelopment project is completed or terminated. 12If, however, a municipality that issued bonds in connection 13with a redevelopment project in a redevelopment project area 14within the State Sales Tax Boundary prior to July 29, 1991 15retires the bonds prior to June 30, 2007 or a municipality that 16entered into contracts in connection with a redevelopment 17project in a redevelopment project area before June 1, 1988 18completes the contracts prior to June 30, 2007, then so long as 19the redevelopment project is not completed or is not 20terminated, the Net State Sales Tax Increment shall be 21calculated, beginning on the date on which the bonds are 22retired or the contracts are completed, as follows: By 23multiplying the Net State Sales Tax Increment by 60% in the 24State Fiscal Year 2002; 50% in the State Fiscal Year 2003; 40% 25in the State Fiscal Year 2004; 30% in the State Fiscal Year 262005; 20% in the State Fiscal Year 2006; and 10% in the State   SB1832- 23 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1Fiscal Year 2007. No payment shall be made for State Fiscal 2Year 2008 and thereafter. Refunding of any bonds issued prior 3to July 29, 1991, shall not alter the Net State Sales Tax 4Increment.5    (j) "State Utility Tax Increment Amount" means an amount 6equal to the aggregate increase in State electric and gas tax 7charges imposed on owners and tenants, other than residential 8customers, of properties located within the redevelopment 9project area under Section 9-222 of the Public Utilities Act, 10over and above the aggregate of such charges as certified by 11the Department of Revenue and paid by owners and tenants, 12other than residential customers, of properties within the 13redevelopment project area during the base year, which shall 14be the calendar year immediately prior to the year of the 15adoption of the ordinance authorizing tax increment allocation 16financing.17    (k) "Net State Utility Tax Increment" means the sum of the 18following: (a) 80% of the first $100,000 of State Utility Tax 19Increment annually generated by a redevelopment project area; 20(b) 60% of the amount in excess of $100,000 but not exceeding 21$500,000 of the State Utility Tax Increment annually generated 22by a redevelopment project area; and (c) 40% of all amounts in 23excess of $500,000 of State Utility Tax Increment annually 24generated by a redevelopment project area. For the State 25Fiscal Year 1999, and every year thereafter until the year 262007, for any municipality that has not entered into a   SB1832- 24 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1contract or has not issued bonds prior to June 1, 1988 to 2finance redevelopment project costs within a redevelopment 3project area, the Net State Utility Tax Increment shall be 4calculated as follows: By multiplying the Net State Utility 5Tax Increment by 90% in the State Fiscal Year 1999; 80% in the 6State Fiscal Year 2000; 70% in the State Fiscal Year 2001; 60% 7in the State Fiscal Year 2002; 50% in the State Fiscal Year 82003; 40% in the State Fiscal Year 2004; 30% in the State 9Fiscal Year 2005; 20% in the State Fiscal Year 2006; and 10% in 10the State Fiscal Year 2007. No payment shall be made for the 11State Fiscal Year 2008 and thereafter.12    Municipalities that issue bonds in connection with the 13redevelopment project during the period from June 1, 1988 14until 3 years after the effective date of this Amendatory Act 15of 1988 shall receive the Net State Utility Tax Increment, 16subject to appropriation, for 15 State Fiscal Years after the 17issuance of such bonds. For the 16th through the 20th State 18Fiscal Years after issuance of the bonds, the Net State 19Utility Tax Increment shall be calculated as follows: By 20multiplying the Net State Utility Tax Increment by 90% in year 2116; 80% in year 17; 70% in year 18; 60% in year 19; and 50% in 22year 20. Refunding of any bonds issued prior to June 1, 1988, 23shall not alter the revised Net State Utility Tax Increment 24payments set forth above.25    (l) "Obligations" mean bonds, loans, debentures, notes, 26special certificates or other evidence of indebtedness issued   SB1832- 25 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1by the municipality to carry out a redevelopment project or to 2refund outstanding obligations.3    (m) "Payment in lieu of taxes" means those estimated tax 4revenues from real property in a redevelopment project area 5derived from real property that has been acquired by a 6municipality which according to the redevelopment project or 7plan is to be used for a private use which taxing districts 8would have received had a municipality not acquired the real 9property and adopted tax increment allocation financing and 10which would result from levies made after the time of the 11adoption of tax increment allocation financing to the time the 12current equalized value of real property in the redevelopment 13project area exceeds the total initial equalized value of real 14property in said area.15    (n) "Redevelopment plan" means the comprehensive program 16of the municipality for development or redevelopment intended 17by the payment of redevelopment project costs to reduce or 18eliminate those conditions the existence of which qualified 19the redevelopment project area as a "blighted area" or 20"conservation area" or combination thereof or "industrial park 21conservation area," and thereby to enhance the tax bases of 22the taxing districts which extend into the redevelopment 23project area, provided that, with respect to redevelopment 24project areas described in subsections (p-1) and (p-2), 25"redevelopment plan" means the comprehensive program of the 26affected municipality for the development of qualifying   SB1832- 26 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1transit facilities. On and after November 1, 1999 (the 2effective date of Public Act 91-478), no redevelopment plan 3may be approved or amended that includes the development of 4vacant land (i) with a golf course and related clubhouse and 5other facilities or (ii) designated by federal, State, county, 6or municipal government as public land for outdoor 7recreational activities or for nature preserves and used for 8that purpose within 5 years prior to the adoption of the 9redevelopment plan. For the purpose of this subsection, 10"recreational activities" is limited to mean camping and 11hunting. Each redevelopment plan shall set forth in writing 12the program to be undertaken to accomplish the objectives and 13shall include but not be limited to:14        (A) an itemized list of estimated redevelopment 15    project costs;16        (B) evidence indicating that the redevelopment project 17    area on the whole has not been subject to growth and 18    development through investment by private enterprise, 19    provided that such evidence shall not be required for any 20    redevelopment project area located within a transit 21    facility improvement area established pursuant to Section 22    11-74.4-3.3;23        (C) an assessment of any financial impact of the 24    redevelopment project area on or any increased demand for 25    services from any taxing district affected by the plan and 26    any program to address such financial impact or increased   SB1832- 27 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1    demand;2        (D) the sources of funds to pay costs;3        (E) the nature and term of the obligations to be 4    issued;5        (F) the most recent equalized assessed valuation of 6    the redevelopment project area;7        (G) an estimate as to the equalized assessed valuation 8    after redevelopment and the general land uses to apply in 9    the redevelopment project area;10        (H) a commitment to fair employment practices and an 11    affirmative action plan;12        (I) if it concerns an industrial park conservation 13    area, the plan shall also include a general description of 14    any proposed developer, user and tenant of any property, a 15    description of the type, structure and general character 16    of the facilities to be developed, a description of the 17    type, class and number of new employees to be employed in 18    the operation of the facilities to be developed; and19        (J) if property is to be annexed to the municipality, 20    the plan shall include the terms of the annexation 21    agreement.22    The provisions of items (B) and (C) of this subsection (n) 23shall not apply to a municipality that before March 14, 1994 24(the effective date of Public Act 88-537) had fixed, either by 25its corporate authorities or by a commission designated under 26subsection (k) of Section 11-74.4-4, a time and place for a   SB1832- 28 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1public hearing as required by subsection (a) of Section 211-74.4-5. No redevelopment plan shall be adopted unless a 3municipality complies with all of the following requirements:4        (1) The municipality finds that the redevelopment 5    project area on the whole has not been subject to growth 6    and development through investment by private enterprise 7    and would not reasonably be anticipated to be developed 8    without the adoption of the redevelopment plan, provided, 9    however, that such a finding shall not be required with 10    respect to any redevelopment project area located within a 11    transit facility improvement area established pursuant to 12    Section 11-74.4-3.3.13        (2) The municipality finds that the redevelopment plan 14    and project conform to the comprehensive plan for the 15    development of the municipality as a whole, or, for 16    municipalities with a population of 100,000 or more, 17    regardless of when the redevelopment plan and project was 18    adopted, the redevelopment plan and project either: (i) 19    conforms to the strategic economic development or 20    redevelopment plan issued by the designated planning 21    authority of the municipality, or (ii) includes land uses 22    that have been approved by the planning commission of the 23    municipality.24        (3) The redevelopment plan establishes the estimated 25    dates of completion of the redevelopment project and 26    retirement of obligations issued to finance redevelopment   SB1832- 29 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1    project costs. Those dates may not be later than the dates 2    set forth under Section 11-74.4-3.5.3        A municipality may by municipal ordinance amend an 4    existing redevelopment plan to conform to this paragraph 5    (3) as amended by Public Act 91-478, which municipal 6    ordinance may be adopted without further hearing or notice 7    and without complying with the procedures provided in this 8    Act pertaining to an amendment to or the initial approval 9    of a redevelopment plan and project and designation of a 10    redevelopment project area.11        (3.5) The municipality finds, in the case of an 12    industrial park conservation area, also that the 13    municipality is a labor surplus municipality and that the 14    implementation of the redevelopment plan will reduce 15    unemployment, create new jobs and by the provision of new 16    facilities enhance the tax base of the taxing districts 17    that extend into the redevelopment project area.18        (4) If any incremental revenues are being utilized 19    under Section 8(a)(1) or 8(a)(2) of this Act in 20    redevelopment project areas approved by ordinance after 21    January 1, 1986, the municipality finds: (a) that the 22    redevelopment project area would not reasonably be 23    developed without the use of such incremental revenues, 24    and (b) that such incremental revenues will be exclusively 25    utilized for the development of the redevelopment project 26    area.  SB1832- 30 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1        (5) If: (a) the redevelopment plan will not result in 2    displacement of residents from 10 or more inhabited 3    residential units, and the municipality certifies in the 4    plan that such displacement will not result from the plan; 5    or (b) the redevelopment plan is for a redevelopment 6    project area or a qualifying transit facility located 7    within a transit facility improvement area established 8    pursuant to Section 11-74.4-3.3, and the applicable 9    project is subject to the process for evaluation of 10    environmental effects under the National Environmental 11    Policy Act of 1969, 42 U.S.C. 4321 et seq., then a housing 12    impact study need not be performed. If, however, the 13    redevelopment plan would result in the displacement of 14    residents from 10 or more inhabited residential units, or 15    if the redevelopment project area contains 75 or more 16    inhabited residential units and no certification is made, 17    then the municipality shall prepare, as part of the 18    separate feasibility report required by subsection (a) of 19    Section 11-74.4-5, a housing impact study.20        Part I of the housing impact study shall include (i) 21    data as to whether the residential units are single family 22    or multi-family units, (ii) the number and type of rooms 23    within the units, if that information is available, (iii) 24    whether the units are inhabited or uninhabited, as 25    determined not less than 45 days before the date that the 26    ordinance or resolution required by subsection (a) of   SB1832- 31 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1    Section 11-74.4-5 is passed, and (iv) data as to the 2    racial and ethnic composition of the residents in the 3    inhabited residential units. The data requirement as to 4    the racial and ethnic composition of the residents in the 5    inhabited residential units shall be deemed to be fully 6    satisfied by data from the most recent federal census.7        Part II of the housing impact study shall identify the 8    inhabited residential units in the proposed redevelopment 9    project area that are to be or may be removed. If inhabited 10    residential units are to be removed, then the housing 11    impact study shall identify (i) the number and location of 12    those units that will or may be removed, (ii) the 13    municipality's plans for relocation assistance for those 14    residents in the proposed redevelopment project area whose 15    residences are to be removed, (iii) the availability of 16    replacement housing for those residents whose residences 17    are to be removed, and shall identify the type, location, 18    and cost of the housing, and (iv) the type and extent of 19    relocation assistance to be provided.20        (6) On and after November 1, 1999, the housing impact 21    study required by paragraph (5) shall be incorporated in 22    the redevelopment plan for the redevelopment project area.23        (7) On and after November 1, 1999, no redevelopment 24    plan shall be adopted, nor an existing plan amended, nor 25    shall residential housing that is occupied by households 26    of low-income and very low-income persons in currently   SB1832- 32 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1    existing redevelopment project areas be removed after 2    November 1, 1999 unless the redevelopment plan provides, 3    with respect to inhabited housing units that are to be 4    removed for households of low-income and very low-income 5    persons, affordable housing and relocation assistance not 6    less than that which would be provided under the federal 7    Uniform Relocation Assistance and Real Property 8    Acquisition Policies Act of 1970 and the regulations under 9    that Act, including the eligibility criteria. Affordable 10    housing may be either existing or newly constructed 11    housing. For purposes of this paragraph (7), "low-income 12    households", "very low-income households", and "affordable 13    housing" have the meanings set forth in the Illinois 14    Affordable Housing Act. The municipality shall make a good 15    faith effort to ensure that this affordable housing is 16    located in or near the redevelopment project area within 17    the municipality.18        (8) On and after November 1, 1999, if, after the 19    adoption of the redevelopment plan for the redevelopment 20    project area, any municipality desires to amend its 21    redevelopment plan to remove more inhabited residential 22    units than specified in its original redevelopment plan, 23    that change shall be made in accordance with the 24    procedures in subsection (c) of Section 11-74.4-5.25        (9) For redevelopment project areas designated prior 26    to November 1, 1999, the redevelopment plan may be amended   SB1832- 33 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1    without further joint review board meeting or hearing, 2    provided that the municipality shall give notice of any 3    such changes by mail to each affected taxing district and 4    registrant on the interested party registry, to authorize 5    the municipality to expend tax increment revenues for 6    redevelopment project costs defined by paragraphs (5) and 7    (7.5), subparagraphs (E) and (F) of paragraph (11), and 8    paragraph (11.5) of subsection (q) of Section 11-74.4-3, 9    so long as the changes do not increase the total estimated 10    redevelopment project costs set out in the redevelopment 11    plan by more than 5% after adjustment for inflation from 12    the date the plan was adopted.13    (o) "Redevelopment project" means any public and private 14development project in furtherance of the objectives of a 15redevelopment plan. On and after November 1, 1999 (the 16effective date of Public Act 91-478), no redevelopment plan 17may be approved or amended that includes the development of 18vacant land (i) with a golf course and related clubhouse and 19other facilities or (ii) designated by federal, State, county, 20or municipal government as public land for outdoor 21recreational activities or for nature preserves and used for 22that purpose within 5 years prior to the adoption of the 23redevelopment plan. For the purpose of this subsection, 24"recreational activities" is limited to mean camping and 25hunting.26    (p) "Redevelopment project area" means an area designated   SB1832- 34 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1by the municipality, which is not less in the aggregate than 1 21/2 acres and in respect to which the municipality has made a 3finding that there exist conditions which cause the area to be 4classified as an industrial park conservation area or a 5blighted area or a conservation area, or a combination of both 6blighted areas and conservation areas.7    (p-1) Notwithstanding any provision of this Act to the 8contrary, on and after August 25, 2009 (the effective date of 9Public Act 96-680), a redevelopment project area may include 10areas within a one-half mile radius of an existing or proposed 11Regional Transportation Authority Suburban Transit Access 12Route (STAR Line) station without a finding that the area is 13classified as an industrial park conservation area, a blighted 14area, a conservation area, or a combination thereof, but only 15if the municipality receives unanimous consent from the joint 16review board created to review the proposed redevelopment 17project area. 18    (p-2) Notwithstanding any provision of this Act to the 19contrary, on and after the effective date of this amendatory 20Act of the 99th General Assembly, a redevelopment project area 21may include areas within a transit facility improvement area 22that has been established pursuant to Section 11-74.4-3.3 23without a finding that the area is classified as an industrial 24park conservation area, a blighted area, a conservation area, 25or any combination thereof. 26    (q) "Redevelopment project costs", except for   SB1832- 35 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1redevelopment project areas created pursuant to subsection 2(p-1) or (p-2), means and includes the sum total of all 3reasonable or necessary costs incurred or estimated to be 4incurred, and any such costs incidental to a redevelopment 5plan and a redevelopment project. Such costs include, without 6limitation, the following:7        (1) Costs of studies, surveys, development of plans, 8    and specifications, implementation and administration of 9    the redevelopment plan including but not limited to staff 10    and professional service costs for architectural, 11    engineering, legal, financial, planning or other services, 12    provided however that no charges for professional services 13    may be based on a percentage of the tax increment 14    collected; except that on and after November 1, 1999 (the 15    effective date of Public Act 91-478), no contracts for 16    professional services, excluding architectural and 17    engineering services, may be entered into if the terms of 18    the contract extend beyond a period of 3 years. In 19    addition, "redevelopment project costs" shall not include 20    lobbying expenses. After consultation with the 21    municipality, each tax increment consultant or advisor to 22    a municipality that plans to designate or has designated a 23    redevelopment project area shall inform the municipality 24    in writing of any contracts that the consultant or advisor 25    has entered into with entities or individuals that have 26    received, or are receiving, payments financed by tax   SB1832- 36 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1    increment revenues produced by the redevelopment project 2    area with respect to which the consultant or advisor has 3    performed, or will be performing, service for the 4    municipality. This requirement shall be satisfied by the 5    consultant or advisor before the commencement of services 6    for the municipality and thereafter whenever any other 7    contracts with those individuals or entities are executed 8    by the consultant or advisor;9        (1.5) After July 1, 1999, annual administrative costs 10    shall not include general overhead or administrative costs 11    of the municipality that would still have been incurred by 12    the municipality if the municipality had not designated a 13    redevelopment project area or approved a redevelopment 14    plan;15        (1.6) The cost of marketing sites within the 16    redevelopment project area to prospective businesses, 17    developers, and investors;18        (2) Property assembly costs, including but not limited 19    to acquisition of land and other property, real or 20    personal, or rights or interests therein, demolition of 21    buildings, site preparation, site improvements that serve 22    as an engineered barrier addressing ground level or below 23    ground environmental contamination, including, but not 24    limited to parking lots and other concrete or asphalt 25    barriers, and the clearing and grading of land;26        (3) Costs of rehabilitation, reconstruction or repair   SB1832- 37 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1    or remodeling of existing public or private buildings, 2    fixtures, and leasehold improvements; and the cost of 3    replacing an existing public building if pursuant to the 4    implementation of a redevelopment project the existing 5    public building is to be demolished to use the site for 6    private investment or devoted to a different use requiring 7    private investment; including any direct or indirect costs 8    relating to Green Globes or LEED certified construction 9    elements or construction elements with an equivalent 10    certification;11        (3.5) Costs of demolishing buildings, site 12    preparation, or site improvements of a dilapidated or 13    vacant parcel zoned for residential use or costs of 14    reconstruction, repair, remodeling, or new construction of 15    a single-family residence on a dilapidated or vacant 16    parcel zoned for residential use; 17        (4) Costs of the construction of public works or 18    improvements, including any direct or indirect costs 19    relating to Green Globes or LEED certified construction 20    elements or construction elements with an equivalent 21    certification, except that on and after November 1, 1999, 22    redevelopment project costs shall not include the cost of 23    constructing a new municipal public building principally 24    used to provide offices, storage space, or conference 25    facilities or vehicle storage, maintenance, or repair for 26    administrative, public safety, or public works personnel   SB1832- 38 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1    and that is not intended to replace an existing public 2    building as provided under paragraph (3) of subsection (q) 3    of Section 11-74.4-3 unless either (i) the construction of 4    the new municipal building implements a redevelopment 5    project that was included in a redevelopment plan that was 6    adopted by the municipality prior to November 1, 1999, 7    (ii) the municipality makes a reasonable determination in 8    the redevelopment plan, supported by information that 9    provides the basis for that determination, that the new 10    municipal building is required to meet an increase in the 11    need for public safety purposes anticipated to result from 12    the implementation of the redevelopment plan, or (iii) the 13    new municipal public building is for the storage, 14    maintenance, or repair of transit vehicles and is located 15    in a transit facility improvement area that has been 16    established pursuant to Section 11-74.4-3.3;17        (5) Costs of job training and retraining projects, 18    including the cost of "welfare to work" programs 19    implemented by businesses located within the redevelopment 20    project area;21        (6) Financing costs, including but not limited to all 22    necessary and incidental expenses related to the issuance 23    of obligations and which may include payment of interest 24    on any obligations issued hereunder including interest 25    accruing during the estimated period of construction of 26    any redevelopment project for which such obligations are   SB1832- 39 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1    issued and for not exceeding 36 months thereafter and 2    including reasonable reserves related thereto;3        (7) To the extent the municipality by written 4    agreement accepts and approves the same, all or a portion 5    of a taxing district's capital costs resulting from the 6    redevelopment project necessarily incurred or to be 7    incurred within a taxing district in furtherance of the 8    objectives of the redevelopment plan and project;9        (7.5) For redevelopment project areas designated (or 10    redevelopment project areas amended to add or increase the 11    number of tax-increment-financing assisted housing units) 12    on or after November 1, 1999, an elementary, secondary, or 13    unit school district's increased costs attributable to 14    assisted housing units located within the redevelopment 15    project area for which the developer or redeveloper 16    receives financial assistance through an agreement with 17    the municipality or because the municipality incurs the 18    cost of necessary infrastructure improvements within the 19    boundaries of the assisted housing sites necessary for the 20    completion of that housing as authorized by this Act, and 21    which costs shall be paid by the municipality from the 22    Special Tax Allocation Fund when the tax increment revenue 23    is received as a result of the assisted housing units and 24    shall be calculated annually as follows:25            (A) for foundation districts, excluding any school 26        district in a municipality with a population in excess   SB1832- 40 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1        of 1,000,000, by multiplying the district's increase 2        in attendance resulting from the net increase in new 3        students enrolled in that school district who reside 4        in housing units within the redevelopment project area 5        that have received financial assistance through an 6        agreement with the municipality or because the 7        municipality incurs the cost of necessary 8        infrastructure improvements within the boundaries of 9        the housing sites necessary for the completion of that 10        housing as authorized by this Act since the 11        designation of the redevelopment project area by the 12        most recently available per capita tuition cost as 13        defined in Section 10-20.12a of the School Code less 14        any increase in general State aid as defined in 15        Section 18-8.05 of the School Code or evidence-based 16        funding as defined in Section 18-8.15 of the School 17        Code attributable to these added new students subject 18        to the following annual limitations:19                (i) for unit school districts with a district 20            average 1995-96 Per Capita Tuition Charge of less 21            than $5,900, no more than 25% of the total amount 22            of property tax increment revenue produced by 23            those housing units that have received tax 24            increment finance assistance under this Act;25                (ii) for elementary school districts with a 26            district average 1995-96 Per Capita Tuition Charge   SB1832- 41 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1            of less than $5,900, no more than 17% of the total 2            amount of property tax increment revenue produced 3            by those housing units that have received tax 4            increment finance assistance under this Act; and5                (iii) for secondary school districts with a 6            district average 1995-96 Per Capita Tuition Charge 7            of less than $5,900, no more than 8% of the total 8            amount of property tax increment revenue produced 9            by those housing units that have received tax 10            increment finance assistance under this Act.11            (B) For alternate method districts, flat grant 12        districts, and foundation districts with a district 13        average 1995-96 Per Capita Tuition Charge equal to or 14        more than $5,900, excluding any school district with a 15        population in excess of 1,000,000, by multiplying the 16        district's increase in attendance resulting from the 17        net increase in new students enrolled in that school 18        district who reside in housing units within the 19        redevelopment project area that have received 20        financial assistance through an agreement with the 21        municipality or because the municipality incurs the 22        cost of necessary infrastructure improvements within 23        the boundaries of the housing sites necessary for the 24        completion of that housing as authorized by this Act 25        since the designation of the redevelopment project 26        area by the most recently available per capita tuition   SB1832- 42 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1        cost as defined in Section 10-20.12a of the School 2        Code less any increase in general state aid as defined 3        in Section 18-8.05 of the School Code or 4        evidence-based funding as defined in Section 18-8.15 5        of the School Code attributable to these added new 6        students subject to the following annual limitations:7                (i) for unit school districts, no more than 8            40% of the total amount of property tax increment 9            revenue produced by those housing units that have 10            received tax increment finance assistance under 11            this Act;12                (ii) for elementary school districts, no more 13            than 27% of the total amount of property tax 14            increment revenue produced by those housing units 15            that have received tax increment finance 16            assistance under this Act; and17                (iii) for secondary school districts, no more 18            than 13% of the total amount of property tax 19            increment revenue produced by those housing units 20            that have received tax increment finance 21            assistance under this Act.22            (C) For any school district in a municipality with 23        a population in excess of 1,000,000, the following 24        restrictions shall apply to the reimbursement of 25        increased costs under this paragraph (7.5):26                (i) no increased costs shall be reimbursed   SB1832- 43 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1            unless the school district certifies that each of 2            the schools affected by the assisted housing 3            project is at or over its student capacity;4                (ii) the amount reimbursable shall be reduced 5            by the value of any land donated to the school 6            district by the municipality or developer, and by 7            the value of any physical improvements made to the 8            schools by the municipality or developer; and9                (iii) the amount reimbursed may not affect 10            amounts otherwise obligated by the terms of any 11            bonds, notes, or other funding instruments, or the 12            terms of any redevelopment agreement.13        Any school district seeking payment under this 14        paragraph (7.5) shall, after July 1 and before 15        September 30 of each year, provide the municipality 16        with reasonable evidence to support its claim for 17        reimbursement before the municipality shall be 18        required to approve or make the payment to the school 19        district. If the school district fails to provide the 20        information during this period in any year, it shall 21        forfeit any claim to reimbursement for that year. 22        School districts may adopt a resolution waiving the 23        right to all or a portion of the reimbursement 24        otherwise required by this paragraph (7.5). By 25        acceptance of this reimbursement the school district 26        waives the right to directly or indirectly set aside,   SB1832- 44 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1        modify, or contest in any manner the establishment of 2        the redevelopment project area or projects;3        (7.7) For redevelopment project areas designated (or 4    redevelopment project areas amended to add or increase the 5    number of tax-increment-financing assisted housing units) 6    on or after January 1, 2005 (the effective date of Public 7    Act 93-961), a public library district's increased costs 8    attributable to assisted housing units located within the 9    redevelopment project area for which the developer or 10    redeveloper receives financial assistance through an 11    agreement with the municipality or because the 12    municipality incurs the cost of necessary infrastructure 13    improvements within the boundaries of the assisted housing 14    sites necessary for the completion of that housing as 15    authorized by this Act shall be paid to the library 16    district by the municipality from the Special Tax 17    Allocation Fund when the tax increment revenue is received 18    as a result of the assisted housing units. This paragraph 19    (7.7) applies only if (i) the library district is located 20    in a county that is subject to the Property Tax Extension 21    Limitation Law or (ii) the library district is not located 22    in a county that is subject to the Property Tax Extension 23    Limitation Law but the district is prohibited by any other 24    law from increasing its tax levy rate without a prior 25    voter referendum.26        The amount paid to a library district under this   SB1832- 45 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1    paragraph (7.7) shall be calculated by multiplying (i) the 2    net increase in the number of persons eligible to obtain a 3    library card in that district who reside in housing units 4    within the redevelopment project area that have received 5    financial assistance through an agreement with the 6    municipality or because the municipality incurs the cost 7    of necessary infrastructure improvements within the 8    boundaries of the housing sites necessary for the 9    completion of that housing as authorized by this Act since 10    the designation of the redevelopment project area by (ii) 11    the per-patron cost of providing library services so long 12    as it does not exceed $120. The per-patron cost shall be 13    the Total Operating Expenditures Per Capita for the 14    library in the previous fiscal year. The municipality may 15    deduct from the amount that it must pay to a library 16    district under this paragraph any amount that it has 17    voluntarily paid to the library district from the tax 18    increment revenue. The amount paid to a library district 19    under this paragraph (7.7) shall be no more than 2% of the 20    amount produced by the assisted housing units and 21    deposited into the Special Tax Allocation Fund.22        A library district is not eligible for any payment 23    under this paragraph (7.7) unless the library district has 24    experienced an increase in the number of patrons from the 25    municipality that created the tax-increment-financing 26    district since the designation of the redevelopment   SB1832- 46 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1    project area.2        Any library district seeking payment under this 3    paragraph (7.7) shall, after July 1 and before September 4    30 of each year, provide the municipality with convincing 5    evidence to support its claim for reimbursement before the 6    municipality shall be required to approve or make the 7    payment to the library district. If the library district 8    fails to provide the information during this period in any 9    year, it shall forfeit any claim to reimbursement for that 10    year. Library districts may adopt a resolution waiving the 11    right to all or a portion of the reimbursement otherwise 12    required by this paragraph (7.7). By acceptance of such 13    reimbursement, the library district shall forfeit any 14    right to directly or indirectly set aside, modify, or 15    contest in any manner whatsoever the establishment of the 16    redevelopment project area or projects;17        (8) Relocation costs to the extent that a municipality 18    determines that relocation costs shall be paid or is 19    required to make payment of relocation costs by federal or 20    State law or in order to satisfy subparagraph (7) of 21    subsection (n);22        (9) Payment in lieu of taxes;23        (10) Costs of job training, retraining, advanced 24    vocational education or career education, including but 25    not limited to courses in occupational, semi-technical or 26    technical fields leading directly to employment, incurred   SB1832- 47 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1    by one or more taxing districts, provided that such costs 2    (i) are related to the establishment and maintenance of 3    additional job training, advanced vocational education or 4    career education programs for persons employed or to be 5    employed by employers located in a redevelopment project 6    area; and (ii) when incurred by a taxing district or 7    taxing districts other than the municipality, are set 8    forth in a written agreement by or among the municipality 9    and the taxing district or taxing districts, which 10    agreement describes the program to be undertaken, 11    including but not limited to the number of employees to be 12    trained, a description of the training and services to be 13    provided, the number and type of positions available or to 14    be available, itemized costs of the program and sources of 15    funds to pay for the same, and the term of the agreement. 16    Such costs include, specifically, the payment by community 17    college districts of costs pursuant to Sections 3-37, 18    3-38, 3-40 and 3-40.1 of the Public Community College Act 19    and by school districts of costs pursuant to Sections 20    10-22.20a and 10-23.3a of the School Code;21        (11) Interest cost incurred by a redeveloper related 22    to the construction, renovation or rehabilitation of a 23    redevelopment project provided that:24            (A) such costs are to be paid directly from the 25        special tax allocation fund established pursuant to 26        this Act;  SB1832- 48 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1            (B) such payments in any one year may not exceed 2        30% of the annual interest costs incurred by the 3        redeveloper with regard to the redevelopment project 4        during that year;5            (C) if there are not sufficient funds available in 6        the special tax allocation fund to make the payment 7        pursuant to this paragraph (11) then the amounts so 8        due shall accrue and be payable when sufficient funds 9        are available in the special tax allocation fund;10            (D) the total of such interest payments paid 11        pursuant to this Act may not exceed 30% of the total 12        (i) cost paid or incurred by the redeveloper for the 13        redevelopment project plus (ii) redevelopment project 14        costs excluding any property assembly costs and any 15        relocation costs incurred by a municipality pursuant 16        to this Act;17            (E) the cost limits set forth in subparagraphs (B) 18        and (D) of paragraph (11) shall be modified for the 19        financing of rehabilitated or new housing units for 20        low-income households and very low-income households, 21        as defined in Section 3 of the Illinois Affordable 22        Housing Act. The percentage of 75% shall be 23        substituted for 30% in subparagraphs (B) and (D) of 24        paragraph (11); and25            (F) instead of the eligible costs provided by 26        subparagraphs (B) and (D) of paragraph (11), as   SB1832- 49 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1        modified by this subparagraph, and notwithstanding any 2        other provisions of this Act to the contrary, the 3        municipality may pay from tax increment revenues up to 4        50% of the cost of construction of new housing units to 5        be occupied by low-income households and very 6        low-income households as defined in Section 3 of the 7        Illinois Affordable Housing Act. The cost of 8        construction of those units may be derived from the 9        proceeds of bonds issued by the municipality under 10        this Act or other constitutional or statutory 11        authority or from other sources of municipal revenue 12        that may be reimbursed from tax increment revenues or 13        the proceeds of bonds issued to finance the 14        construction of that housing.15            The eligible costs provided under this 16        subparagraph (F) of paragraph (11) shall be an 17        eligible cost for the construction, renovation, and 18        rehabilitation of all low and very low-income housing 19        units, as defined in Section 3 of the Illinois 20        Affordable Housing Act, within the redevelopment 21        project area. If the low and very low-income units are 22        part of a residential redevelopment project that 23        includes units not affordable to low and very 24        low-income households, only the low and very 25        low-income units shall be eligible for benefits under 26        this subparagraph (F) of paragraph (11). The standards   SB1832- 50 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1        for maintaining the occupancy by low-income households 2        and very low-income households, as defined in Section 3        3 of the Illinois Affordable Housing Act, of those 4        units constructed with eligible costs made available 5        under the provisions of this subparagraph (F) of 6        paragraph (11) shall be established by guidelines 7        adopted by the municipality. The responsibility for 8        annually documenting the initial occupancy of the 9        units by low-income households and very low-income 10        households, as defined in Section 3 of the Illinois 11        Affordable Housing Act, shall be that of the then 12        current owner of the property. For ownership units, 13        the guidelines will provide, at a minimum, for a 14        reasonable recapture of funds, or other appropriate 15        methods designed to preserve the original 16        affordability of the ownership units. For rental 17        units, the guidelines will provide, at a minimum, for 18        the affordability of rent to low and very low-income 19        households. As units become available, they shall be 20        rented to income-eligible tenants. The municipality 21        may modify these guidelines from time to time; the 22        guidelines, however, shall be in effect for as long as 23        tax increment revenue is being used to pay for costs 24        associated with the units or for the retirement of 25        bonds issued to finance the units or for the life of 26        the redevelopment project area, whichever is later;  SB1832- 51 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1        (11.5) If the redevelopment project area is located 2    within a municipality with a population of more than 3    100,000, the cost of day care services for children of 4    employees from low-income families working for businesses 5    located within the redevelopment project area and all or a 6    portion of the cost of operation of day care centers 7    established by redevelopment project area businesses to 8    serve employees from low-income families working in 9    businesses located in the redevelopment project area. For 10    the purposes of this paragraph, "low-income families" 11    means families whose annual income does not exceed 80% of 12    the municipal, county, or regional median income, adjusted 13    for family size, as the annual income and municipal, 14    county, or regional median income are determined from time 15    to time by the United States Department of Housing and 16    Urban Development.17        (12) Costs relating to the development of urban 18    agricultural areas under Division 15.2 of the Illinois 19    Municipal Code. 20    Unless explicitly stated herein the cost of construction 21of new privately-owned buildings shall not be an eligible 22redevelopment project cost.23    After November 1, 1999 (the effective date of Public Act 2491-478), none of the redevelopment project costs enumerated in 25this subsection shall be eligible redevelopment project costs 26if those costs would provide direct financial support to a   SB1832- 52 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1retail entity initiating operations in the redevelopment 2project area while terminating operations at another Illinois 3location within 10 miles of the redevelopment project area but 4outside the boundaries of the redevelopment project area 5municipality. For purposes of this paragraph, termination 6means a closing of a retail operation that is directly related 7to the opening of the same operation or like retail entity 8owned or operated by more than 50% of the original ownership in 9a redevelopment project area, but it does not mean closing an 10operation for reasons beyond the control of the retail entity, 11as documented by the retail entity, subject to a reasonable 12finding by the municipality that the current location 13contained inadequate space, had become economically obsolete, 14or was no longer a viable location for the retailer or 15serviceman.16    No cost shall be a redevelopment project cost in a 17redevelopment project area if used to demolish, remove, or 18substantially modify a historic resource, after August 26, 192008 (the effective date of Public Act 95-934), unless no 20prudent and feasible alternative exists. "Historic resource" 21for the purpose of this paragraph means (i) a place or 22structure that is included or eligible for inclusion on the 23National Register of Historic Places or (ii) a contributing 24structure in a district on the National Register of Historic 25Places. This paragraph does not apply to a place or structure 26for which demolition, removal, or modification is subject to   SB1832- 53 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1review by the preservation agency of a Certified Local 2Government designated as such by the National Park Service of 3the United States Department of the Interior.4    If a special service area has been established pursuant to 5the Special Service Area Tax Act or Special Service Area Tax 6Law, then any tax increment revenues derived from the tax 7imposed pursuant to the Special Service Area Tax Act or 8Special Service Area Tax Law may be used within the 9redevelopment project area for the purposes permitted by that 10Act or Law as well as the purposes permitted by this Act.11    (q-1) For redevelopment project areas created pursuant to 12subsection (p-1), redevelopment project costs are limited to 13those costs in paragraph (q) that are related to the existing 14or proposed Regional Transportation Authority Suburban Transit 15Access Route (STAR Line) station. 16    (q-2) For a transit facility improvement area established 17prior to, on, or after the effective date of this amendatory 18Act of the 102nd General Assembly: (i) "redevelopment project 19costs" means those costs described in subsection (q) that are 20related to the construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, 21remodeling, or repair of any existing or proposed transit 22facility, whether that facility is located within or outside 23the boundaries of a redevelopment project area established 24within that transit facility improvement area (and, to the 25extent a redevelopment project cost is described in subsection 26(q) as incurred or estimated to be incurred with respect to a   SB1832- 54 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1redevelopment project area, then it shall apply with respect 2to such transit facility improvement area); and (ii) the 3provisions of Section 11-74.4-8 regarding tax increment 4allocation financing for a redevelopment project area located 5in a transit facility improvement area shall apply only to the 6lots, blocks, tracts and parcels of real property that are 7located within the boundaries of that redevelopment project 8area and not to the lots, blocks, tracts, and parcels of real 9property that are located outside the boundaries of that 10redevelopment project area. 11    (r) "State Sales Tax Boundary" means the redevelopment 12project area or the amended redevelopment project area 13boundaries which are determined pursuant to subsection (9) of 14Section 11-74.4-8a of this Act. The Department of Revenue 15shall certify pursuant to subsection (9) of Section 11-74.4-8a 16the appropriate boundaries eligible for the determination of 17State Sales Tax Increment.18    (s) "State Sales Tax Increment" means an amount equal to 19the increase in the aggregate amount of taxes paid by 20retailers and servicemen, other than retailers and servicemen 21subject to the Public Utilities Act, on transactions at places 22of business located within a State Sales Tax Boundary pursuant 23to the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, the Use Tax Act, the 24Service Use Tax Act, and the Service Occupation Tax Act, 25except such portion of such increase that is paid into the 26State and Local Sales Tax Reform Fund, the Local Government   SB1832- 55 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1Distributive Fund, the Local Government Tax Fund and the 2County and Mass Transit District Fund, for as long as State 3participation exists, over and above the Initial Sales Tax 4Amounts, Adjusted Initial Sales Tax Amounts or the Revised 5Initial Sales Tax Amounts for such taxes as certified by the 6Department of Revenue and paid under those Acts by retailers 7and servicemen on transactions at places of business located 8within the State Sales Tax Boundary during the base year which 9shall be the calendar year immediately prior to the year in 10which the municipality adopted tax increment allocation 11financing, less 3.0% of such amounts generated under the 12Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, Use Tax Act and Service Use Tax 13Act and the Service Occupation Tax Act, which sum shall be 14appropriated to the Department of Revenue to cover its costs 15of administering and enforcing this Section. For purposes of 16computing the aggregate amount of such taxes for base years 17occurring prior to 1985, the Department of Revenue shall 18compute the Initial Sales Tax Amount for such taxes and deduct 19therefrom an amount equal to 4% of the aggregate amount of 20taxes per year for each year the base year is prior to 1985, 21but not to exceed a total deduction of 12%. The amount so 22determined shall be known as the "Adjusted Initial Sales Tax 23Amount". For purposes of determining the State Sales Tax 24Increment the Department of Revenue shall for each period 25subtract from the tax amounts received from retailers and 26servicemen on transactions located in the State Sales Tax   SB1832- 56 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1Boundary, the certified Initial Sales Tax Amounts, Adjusted 2Initial Sales Tax Amounts or Revised Initial Sales Tax Amounts 3for the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, the Use Tax Act, the 4Service Use Tax Act and the Service Occupation Tax Act. For the 5State Fiscal Year 1989 this calculation shall be made by 6utilizing the calendar year 1987 to determine the tax amounts 7received. For the State Fiscal Year 1990, this calculation 8shall be made by utilizing the period from January 1, 1988, 9until September 30, 1988, to determine the tax amounts 10received from retailers and servicemen, which shall have 11deducted therefrom nine-twelfths of the certified Initial 12Sales Tax Amounts, Adjusted Initial Sales Tax Amounts or the 13Revised Initial Sales Tax Amounts as appropriate. For the 14State Fiscal Year 1991, this calculation shall be made by 15utilizing the period from October 1, 1988, until June 30, 161989, to determine the tax amounts received from retailers and 17servicemen, which shall have deducted therefrom nine-twelfths 18of the certified Initial State Sales Tax Amounts, Adjusted 19Initial Sales Tax Amounts or the Revised Initial Sales Tax 20Amounts as appropriate. For every State Fiscal Year 21thereafter, the applicable period shall be the 12 months 22beginning July 1 and ending on June 30, to determine the tax 23amounts received which shall have deducted therefrom the 24certified Initial Sales Tax Amounts, Adjusted Initial Sales 25Tax Amounts or the Revised Initial Sales Tax Amounts. 26Municipalities intending to receive a distribution of State   SB1832- 57 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1Sales Tax Increment must report a list of retailers to the 2Department of Revenue by October 31, 1988 and by July 31, of 3each year thereafter.4    (t) "Taxing districts" means counties, townships, cities 5and incorporated towns and villages, school, road, park, 6sanitary, mosquito abatement, forest preserve, public health, 7fire protection, river conservancy, tuberculosis sanitarium 8and any other municipal corporations or districts with the 9power to levy taxes.10    (u) "Taxing districts' capital costs" means those costs of 11taxing districts for capital improvements that are found by 12the municipal corporate authorities to be necessary and 13directly result from the redevelopment project.14    (v) As used in subsection (a) of Section 11-74.4-3 of this 15Act, "vacant land" means any parcel or combination of parcels 16of real property without industrial, commercial, and 17residential buildings which has not been used for commercial 18agricultural purposes within 5 years prior to the designation 19of the redevelopment project area, unless the parcel is 20included in an industrial park conservation area or the parcel 21has been subdivided; provided that if the parcel was part of a 22larger tract that has been divided into 3 or more smaller 23tracts that were accepted for recording during the period from 241950 to 1990, then the parcel shall be deemed to have been 25subdivided, and all proceedings and actions of the 26municipality taken in that connection with respect to any   SB1832- 58 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1previously approved or designated redevelopment project area 2or amended redevelopment project area are hereby validated and 3hereby declared to be legally sufficient for all purposes of 4this Act. For purposes of this Section and only for land 5subject to the subdivision requirements of the Plat Act, land 6is subdivided when the original plat of the proposed 7Redevelopment Project Area or relevant portion thereof has 8been properly certified, acknowledged, approved, and recorded 9or filed in accordance with the Plat Act and a preliminary 10plat, if any, for any subsequent phases of the proposed 11Redevelopment Project Area or relevant portion thereof has 12been properly approved and filed in accordance with the 13applicable ordinance of the municipality.14    (w) "Annual Total Increment" means the sum of each 15municipality's annual Net Sales Tax Increment and each 16municipality's annual Net Utility Tax Increment. The ratio of 17the Annual Total Increment of each municipality to the Annual 18Total Increment for all municipalities, as most recently 19calculated by the Department, shall determine the proportional 20shares of the Illinois Tax Increment Fund to be distributed to 21each municipality.22    (x) "LEED certified" means any certification level of 23construction elements by a qualified Leadership in Energy and 24Environmental Design Accredited Professional as determined by 25the U.S. Green Building Council.26    (y) "Green Globes certified" means any certification level   SB1832- 59 -LRB104 03760 RTM 13784 b1of construction elements by a qualified Green Globes 2Professional as determined by the Green Building Initiative.3(Source: P.A. 102-627, eff. 8-27-21.)